Alabama, session 2026rs, HB85.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 40-7-63, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:

Page 1

HB85 INTRODUCED
"§40-7-63
(a) The appraisal of property shall be commenced and
completed for each county at the earliest dates consistent
with good business and sound appraisal practices, but in any
event completed not later than two years from January 19,
1972.
(b) Reappraisals of Class II and Class III properties
shall occur no more than every three years from the previous
appraisal.
(c) If the assessment of the property appraised
pursuant to subsection (b) increases over the prior
assessment, the increase in assessment shall be phased in
equally over the next three years. If the value of the real
property has not increased, the assessment determined shall be
based on the most recent appraisal."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on May 1,
2026.
Page 2